Hawaii statutes.
[§87A-9] Legal adviser. The attorney
general shall serve as legal adviser to the board and shall provide legal
representation for the Hawaii employer-union health benefits trust fund. [L
2001, c 88, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next